Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-402
Board of Educational Lands and Funds; seal.

The Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall procure a seal with proper devices and the words Nebraska State Land Office included thereon, which seal shall be used by it officially in all matters pertaining to its office wherein a seal is required.

Laws 1877, § 3, p. 173;

R.S.1913, § 5567;

C.S.1922, § 4871;

C.S.1929, § 84-410;

R.S.1943, § 84-402;

Laws 1971, LB 653, § 11.